Louisiana, session 2026, HB143.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:824(B)(1)(a) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§824. Commitment of persons to the Department of Public Safety and Corrections
* * *
B.(1)(a)(i) In the event any individual has been committed to the department
for confinement which is or has been delayed or prevented after final sentence by
court order restricting the department from institutionalizing the individual, or when
the individual is not institutionalized in a state penal or corrections institution
because of lack of facilities under the control of the department, or the department
otherwise refused to accept the individual for confinement, which resulted or has
resulted in the individual being confined in a parish jail or institution after final
sentence, or when he is being held in the parish jail without bail, pending an appeal,
or when he is a participant in a Blue Walters Substance Abuse Program by order of
a court in lieu of revocation of probation or by the committee on parole in lieu of
revocation of parole, the department shall pay to each parish sheriff, or to the
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 143 ENROLLED
governing authority of those parishes in which the governing authority operates the
parish jail, for keeping and feeding the individual in the parish jail the jail:
(aa) The sum of twenty-five dollars and thirty-nine cents per day for Fiscal
Year 2019-2020, the.
(bb) The sum of twenty-six dollars and thirty-nine cents per day for Fiscal
Year 2020-2021, through Fiscal Year 2026-2027.
(cc) The sum of twenty-nine dollars and thirty-nine cents per day for Fiscal
Year 2027-2028 and each fiscal year thereafter.
(ii) Such daily sum The daily sum required pursuant to Item (i) of this
Subparagraph shall be paid from date of sentencing until the individual is confined
in a penal or correctional institution under the supervision of the department. The
department shall work with sheriffs, or the governing authority of those parishes in
which the governing authority operates the parish jail, to ensure that the basic jail
guidelines are amended by December 31, 2020, to specifically provide for treatment
and educational programming for individuals confined in a parish jail or institution.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.